Basque.aff
FLAG num
SFX 358 Y 117
SFX 358    rri       rrekin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrekiko/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrendako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrentzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrentzako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rren/238      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrena      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenak      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenarekin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenarendako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenarentzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenari      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenaz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenei      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenek      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenekin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenendako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenentzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetaraino      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetarantz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetarat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetara      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetatik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetan      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetarik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenez      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrengan      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrengana      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenganaino      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenganantz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrengandik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrengatik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenoi      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenok      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenokin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenontzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenotaz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenoz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rreni      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenean      rri
SFX 358    rri       rreneraino      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenerantz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenerat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenera      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrenetik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rregatik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrek      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretaz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoa      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoago/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoak      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoarekin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoarendako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoarentzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoari      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoaz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoegi      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoei      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoek      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoekin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoendako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoentzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoetaraino      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoetarantz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoetarat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoetara      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoetatik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoetan      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoetarik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoez      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakogatik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakooi      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakook      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakookin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoontzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakootaz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakooz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakok      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotaraino      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotarantz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotarat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotara      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotatik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotan      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotarik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakorekin      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakorendako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakorentzat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakori      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakorik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoan      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakoraino      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakorantz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakorat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakora      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretakotik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretaraino      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarainoko/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarantz      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarantzago/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarantzegi      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretaranzko/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarat      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarako/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretara      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarago/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretatik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretatiko/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretan      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretarik      rri
SFX 358    rri       rretariko/243      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrez      rri
SFX 358    rri       rrezaz      rri
